Maryland, session 2026, HB1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–3201.

HOUSE BILL 1117 3
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Council” means the Virginia I. Jones Alzheimer’s Disease and Related
Dementias Council.
13–3206.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “ELOPEMENT” MEANS BEHAVIOR IN WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH A COGNITIVE, DEVELOPMENTAL, OR NEUROLOGICAL CONDITION LEAVES OR
ATTEMPTS TO LEAVE A SAFE AND SUPERVISED AREA WITHOUT:
1. THE ABILITY TO RECOGNIZE OR AVOID RISK; OR
2. THE ABILITY TO RETURN SAFELY WITHOUT
ASSISTANCE.
(II) “ELOPEMENT” INCLUDES WANDERING THAT CREATES A
RISK OF HARM, INJURY, OR DEATH.
(3) (I) “ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” MEANS AN ASSISTIVE
TECHNOLOGY DEVICE OR A MEDICAL SAFETY DEVICE THAT IS:
1. A WEARABLE, PORTABLE, OR INTEGRATED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE OR SYSTEM THAT USES GLOBAL POSITIONING SYSTEM
TECHNOLOGY, RADIO FREQUENCY IDENTIFICATION TECHNOLOGY, BLUETOOTH, OR
SIMILAR TECHNOLOGY TO SUPPORT THE IDENTIFICATION, MONITORING, OR RAPID
LOCATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL AT RISK OF ELOPEMENT DUE TO A COGNITIVE,
DEVELOPMENTAL, NEUROLOGICAL, OR MEMORY–RELATED CONDITION; AND
2. USED FOR PURPOSES OF PATIENT SAFETY,
FUNCTIONAL INDEPENDENCE, AND PARTICIPATION IN HOME OR COMMUNITY
SETTINGS.
(II) “ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” INCLUDES:
1. A DEVICE DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH THAT HAS FEATURES THAT ENABLE THE SECURE STORAGE AND
TRANSMISSION OF CRITICAL INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION TO CAREGIVERS,
EMERGENCY PERSONNEL, OR FIRST RESPONDERS TO FACILITATE TIMELY,
INFORMED, AND COORDINATED RESPONSE IN ELOPEMENT EMERGENCY
SITUATIONS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1117
2. ANY ELECTRONIC MONITORING SERVICES
NECESSARY FOR A DEVICE DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
TO FUNCTION AS A MEDICAL SAFETY AND ASSISTIVE TOOL.
(B) THE COUNCIL MAY RECOMMEND THE USE OF ELOPEMENT RESPONSE
DEVICES AS SAFETY TOOLS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE AT RISK OF ELOPEMENT
BECAUSE OF ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED DEMENTIAS.
Article – Human Services
7–112.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “ELOPEMENT” MEANS BEHAVIOR IN WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH A COGNITIVE, DEVELOPMENTAL, OR NEUROLOGICAL CONDITION LEAVES OR
ATTEMPTS TO LEAVE A SAFE AND SUPERVISED AREA WITHOUT:
1. THE ABILITY TO RECOGNIZE OR AVOID RISK; OR
2. THE ABILITY TO RETURN SAFELY WITHOUT
ASSISTANCE.
(II) “ELOPEMENT” INCLUDES WANDERING THAT CREATES A
RISK OF HARM, INJURY, OR DEATH.
(3) (I) “ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” MEANS AN ASSISTIVE
TECHNOLOGY OR A MEDICAL SAFETY DEVICE THAT IS:
1. A WEARABLE, PORTABLE, OR INTEGRATED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE OR SYSTEM THAT USES GLOBAL POSITIONING SYSTEM
TECHNOLOGY, RADIO FREQUENCY IDENTIFICATION TECHNOLOGY, BLUETOOTH, OR
SIMILAR TECHNOLOGY TO SUPPORT THE IDENTIFICATION, MONITORING, OR RAPID
LOCATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL AT RISK OF ELOPEMENT DUE TO A COGNITIVE,
DEVELOPMENTAL, NEUROLOGICAL, OR MEMORY–RELATED CONDITION; AND
2. USED FOR PURPOSES OF PATIENT SAFETY,
FUNCTIONAL INDEPENDENCE, AND PARTICIPATION IN HOME, COMMUNITY, OR
EDUCATIONAL SETTINGS.
(II) “ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 1117 5
1. A DEVICE DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH THAT HAS FEATURES THAT ENABLE THE SECURE STORAGE AND
TRANSMISSION OF CRITICAL INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION TO CAREGIVERS,
EMERGENCY PERSONNEL, OR FIRST RESPONDERS TO FACILITATE TIMELY,
INFORMED, AND COORDINATED RESPONSE IN ELOPEMENT EMERGENCY
SITUATIONS; AND
2. ANY ELECTRONIC MONITORING SERVICES
NECESSARY FOR A DEVICE DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
TO FUNCTION AS A MEDICAL SAFETY AND ASSISTIVE TOOL.
(B) THE ADVISORY STAKEHOLDER GROUP ON AUTISM–RELATED NEEDS
MAY RECOMMEND THE USE OF ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICES AS SAFETY TOOLS
FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE AT RISK OF ELOPEMENT BECAUSE OF AUTISM.
SUBTITLE 32B. ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICES.
13–32B–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 15–160 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) “ELOPEMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–160 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
13–32B–02.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW, IF A STATE PROGRAM
PROVIDES FUNDING OR REIMBURSEMENT FOR OR THE DIRECT PROVISION OF
MEDICAL EQUIPMENT OR MEDICAL–RELATED SUPPLIES TO OLDER ADULTS OR
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, THE STATE PROGRAM SHALL CONSIDER AN
APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE TO BE A MEDICAL DEVICE, DURABLE
MEDICAL EQUIPMENT, OR ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY FOR PURPOSES OF THE STATE
PROGRAM.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES WITHOUT REGARD
TO WHEN THE STATE PROGRAM WAS ESTABLISHED.

HOUSE BILL 1117
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for the
delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in accordance
with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) SHALL PROVIDE, SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF
THE STATE BUDGET AND FEDERAL FINANCIAL PARTICIPATION, COVERAGE OF
ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICES AND SUPPORTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–160 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
15–160.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” MEANS A
MEDICAL DEVICE OR ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR
THE PREVENTION OF OR RESPONSE TO ELOPEMENT.
(II) “APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” INCLUDES
DOOR OR WINDOW SENSORS, WEARABLE OR PORTABLE LOCATION–ENABLED
DEVICES, AND RELATED ALERTING TECHNOLOGY.
(3) “ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT” MEANS A PROGRAM RECIPIENT WHO:
(I) IS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS AND ELIGIBLE FOR EARLY
AND PERIODIC SCREENING, DIAGNOSTIC, AND TREATMENT SERVICES, AS DEFINED
IN § 15–149 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) IS ELIGIBLE FOR COVERAGE THROUGH A HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES WAIVER; OR
(III) HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED WITH ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE OR A
RELATED DEMENTIA AND MEETS MEDICAL NECESSITY CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY
THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1117 7
(4) (I) “ELOPEMENT” MEANS BEHAVIOR IN WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH A COGNITIVE, DEVELOPMENTAL, OR NEUROLOGICAL CONDITION LEAVES OR
ATTEMPTS TO LEAVE A SAFE AND SUPERVISED AREA WITHOUT:
1. THE ABILITY TO RECOGNIZE OR AVOID RISK; OR
2. THE ABILITY TO RETURN SAFELY WITHOUT
ASSISTANCE.
(II) “ELOPEMENT” INCLUDES WANDERING THAT CREATES A
RISK OF HARM, INJURY, OR DEATH.
(5) “QUALIFIED LICENSED PROVIDER” MEANS A PHYSICIAN, A NURSE
PRACTITIONER, A PHYSICIAN’S ASSISTANT, OR ANY OTHER LICENSED HEALTH CARE
PRACTITIONER ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER’S
LICENSE.
(6) “QUALIFYING PLAN” MEANS AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION
PROGRAM, A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PLAN, AN INDIVIDUALIZED FAMILY SERVICE
PLAN, OR ANY OTHER CLINICAL OR EDUCATIONAL PLAN THAT DOCUMENTS A
HISTORY OR RISK OF ELOPEMENT.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO FEDERAL APPROVAL, THE PROGRAM SHALL COVER
AN APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE AND ASSOCIATED SUPPORTS FOR AN
ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT WHEN ORDERED OR PRESCRIBED BY A QUALIFIED LICENSED
PROVIDER AND DOCUMENTED IN A QUALIFYING PLAN.
(2) COVERAGE MAY BE PROVIDED UNDER THE STATE PLAN,
INCLUDING:
(I) AS DURABLE MEDICAL EQUIPMENT OR A COMPARABLE
BENEFIT CATEGORY;
(II) AS AN EPSDT SERVICE WHEN MEDICALLY NECESSARY FOR
ELIGIBLE RECIPIENTS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS; OR
(III) AS ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY OR SPECIALIZED MEDICAL
EQUIPMENT FOR PURPOSES OF A HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES
WAIVER.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH:

HOUSE BILL 1117
(I) REASONABLE PRIOR AUTHORIZATION TO ENSURE
COST–EFFECTIVENESS OF APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICES PROVIDED
UNDER THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) REPLACEMENT AND MAINTENANCE REQUIREMENTS FOR
APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICES PROVIDED UNDER THE PROGRAM TO
ENSURE SAFETY OF ELIGIBLE RECIPIENTS.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE INFORMED CONSENT FOR
ANY LOCATION–ENABLED DEVICE FROM THE ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT OR, IF THE
ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT LACKS THE CAPACITY TO CONSENT, THE ENROLLEE’S PARENT
OR GUARDIAN.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT PRIVACY SAFEGUARDS AND
DATA MINIMIZATION STANDARDS FOR APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICES,
INCLUDING LIMITS ON DATA ELEMENTS, RETENTION, AND ACCESS CONSISTENT
WITH FEDERAL AND STATE LAW.
(3) THE USE OF AN APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE OR
FAILURE TO USE AN APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT BE A CONDITION OF ELIGIBILITY FOR SERVICES OR BENEFITS
UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(D) AN APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE MAY NOT BE
DETERMINED TO BE INELIGIBLE FOR COVERAGE OR FUNDING UNDER THIS SECTION
OR ANY OTHER STATE PROGRAM SOLELY ON THE BASIS THAT THE APPROVED
DEVICE INCORPORATES GLOBAL POSITIONING SYSTEM TECHNOLOGY, WIRELESS
COMMUNICATIONS, OR CONSUMER–AVAILABLE COMPONENTS.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT
OF EDUCATION, SHALL ISSUE GUIDANCE TO ENABLE SCHOOL–BASED BILLING OR
COST ALLOCATION WHEN FEDERALLY ALLOWABLE, INCLUDING FOR USE OF
APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICES IN SCHOOL SETTINGS CONSISTENT
WITH A QUALIFYING PLAN.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUBMIT ANY NECESSARY STATE PLAN AMENDMENTS AND, IF APPLICABLE, WAIVER
AMENDMENTS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAXIMIZE FEDERAL FINANCIAL
PARTICIPATION.

HOUSE BILL 1117 9
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH PILOTS OR PHASED
IMPLEMENTATION.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CARRY OUT THIS SECTION THROUGH
REGULATIONS, PROVIDER BULLETINS, OR GUIDANCE PRIOR TO FINAL ADOPTION OF
REGULATIONS.
(H) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER THROUGH 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE
FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON IMPLEMENTATION
STATUS, UTILIZATION OF APPROVED DEVICES, COSTS, AND OUTCOMES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–801.
(a) This section applies to:
(1) insurers that propose to issue or deliver in the State group or blanket
health insurance policies that are written on an expense–incurred basis; and
(2) nonprofit health service plans that propose to issue or deliver in the
State group medical or major medical contracts that are written on an expense–incurred
basis.
(b) [An] SUBJECT TO § 15–801.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, AN entity subject to this
section shall offer the policyholder the option of providing benefits for expenses arising from
the care, including nursing home care and intermediate or custodial nursing care, of
individuals who have Alzheimer’s disease.
(c) [An] SUBJECT TO § 15–801.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, AN entity subject to this
section shall offer the policyholder the option of providing benefits for expenses arising from
the care of elderly individuals, including nursing home care and intermediate or custodial
nursing care of elderly individuals who have any disease, other than Alzheimer’s disease,
that is designated in regulations adopted by the Commissioner.
(d) An entity subject to this section may establish reasonable limits on the
benefits offered under this section, including copayment and deductible provisions and
maximum annual and lifetime dollar limits.
15–801.1.

HOUSE BILL 1117
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 15–160 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN
DIAGNOSED WITH ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE OR A RELATED DEMENTIA AND MEETS
MEDICAL NECESSITY CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH.
(4) “ELOPEMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–160 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) “QUALIFIED LICENSED PROVIDER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 15–160 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(6) “QUALIFYING PLAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–160 OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
AN APPROVED ELOPEMENT RESPONSE DEVICE AND ASSOCIATED SUPPORTS FOR AN
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL WHEN ORDERED OR PRESCRIBED BY A QUALIFIED LICENSED
PROVIDER AND DOCUMENTED IN A QUALIFYING PLAN.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2027.

HOUSE BILL 1117 11
SECTION 5. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.